Utah statutes.
72-7-503.   Advertising -- Permit required -- Penalty for violation.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person to place any form of advertising upon any
part of the public domain, or within 300 feet of a public highway, except
within the corporate limits of a city or town, and except upon land in private
ownership situated along the highway, without first receiving a permit from
the department, if a state highway, or from the county executive, if a county
road.
(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
